Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.120

Extension of rights and responsibilities—State registered domestic partnerships.

(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, except where inconsistent with federal law or regulations applicable to federal benefit programs, agencies shall amend their rules to reflect the intent of the legislature to ensure that all privileges, immunities, rights, benefits, or responsibilities granted or imposed by statute to an individual because that individual is or was a spouse in a marital relationship are granted or imposed on equivalent terms to an individual because that individual is or was in a state registered domestic partnership.

(2) Except where inconsistent with federal law or regulations applicable to federal benefit programs, all agency orders creating new rules, or amending existing rules, shall be formulated to reflect the intent stated in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) No agency rule is invalid because it does not comply with this section.

[ 2009 c 521 s 2.]